South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3152.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 35, Chapter 5, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-5-4905.     (A) Every motor vehicle when operated on a highway must be equipped with a speedometer which must be maintained in good working order. (B) A person who violates this section must be charged with the offense of "Improper Equipment - Speedometer" and upon conviction must be fined not more than twenty-five dollars. (C) Notwithstanding another provision of law, a person who is charged with operating a motor vehicle twenty miles an hour or less in excess of the posted speed limit and can prove that his vehicle's speedometer was not in good working order at the time of being charged, must be charged with violating subsection (A). SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----